Hawaii, session 2026, HB481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 353H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353H-    Certificate of suitability for employment.  (a)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall issue a certificate of suitability for employment to include evidence of the following: (1)  Fulfilment of sentence and all post-release obligations; (2)  Completion of offender reentry programs; and (3)  Readiness for employment opportunities. (b)  The department shall work closely and collaborate with state and federal agencies and private employers to educate stakeholders on the certification. (c)  The department shall make rules pursuant to chapter 91 relating to the issuance and interpretation of the certificate and its relevance to existing criminal history record checks." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to implement and administer the certification of suitability for employment. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________